Utah statutes.
70A-9a-304.    Law governing perfection and priority of security interests in deposit accounts.

(1)  The local law of a bank's jurisdiction governs perfection, the effect of perfection or nonperfection, and the priority of a security interest in a deposit account maintained with that bank.

(2)  The following rules determine a bank's jurisdiction for purposes of this part:

(a)  If an agreement between the bank and the debtor governing the deposit account expressly provides that a particular jurisdiction is the bank's jurisdiction for purposes of this part, this chapter, or this title, that jurisdiction is the bank's jurisdiction.

(b)  If Subsection (2)(a) does not apply and an agreement between the bank and its customer governing the deposit account expressly provides that the agreement is governed by the law of a particular jurisdiction, that jurisdiction is the bank's jurisdiction.

(c)  If neither Subsection (2)(a) nor Subsection (2)(b) applies and an agreement between the bank and its customer governing the deposit account expressly provides that the deposit account is maintained at an office in a particular jurisdiction, that jurisdiction is the bank's jurisdiction.

(d)  If none of the preceding subsections applies, the bank's jurisdiction is the jurisdiction in which the office identified in an account statement as the office serving the customer's account is located.

(e)  If none of the preceding subsections applies, the bank's jurisdiction is the jurisdiction in which the chief executive office of the bank is located.

